Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3912
Examination and application; completion within time specified.

The written examination required by section 44-4052 shall be successfully completed and an application for a license shall be received by the department within one year after the date of obtaining a certificate of completion of the prelicensing education requirements or all prelicensing education requirements and the examination process shall be repeated.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 98;

Laws 1999, LB 260, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 44-4005.04;

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 32.